Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-613.01
City council members; elected from a ward; election; ballots.

Any city council member in a city under the city manager plan of government to be elected from a ward, or an appointed successor in the event of a vacancy, shall be a resident and a registered voter of such ward. The city council member shall be nominated and elected in the same manner as provided for at-large candidates, except that only residents and registered voters of the ward may participate in the signing of nomination petitions. All nominating petitions and ballots shall clearly identify the ward from which such person shall be a candidate. The ballots within a ward shall not contain the names of ward candidates from other wards.

Laws 1967, c. 90, § 2, p. 280;

Laws 1972, LB 661, § 7;

Laws 1975, LB 323, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 56;

Laws 1984, LB 975, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 520;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 45.